California, session 20252026, AB1433.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 84757.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:84757.3. (a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Noncredit center” means an educational center established and administered by a community college district that only provides noncredit instruction, classes, courses, and programs under Sections 84750.5 and 84757.(2) “Noncredit college” means an independently accredited institution in a community college district that only provides noncredit instruction, classes, courses, and programs under Sections 84750.5 and 84757.(b) The board of governors shall allocate base funding for designated categorical programs to a noncredit college when the noncredit college meets both of the following conditions:(1) Has a president or equivalent executive administrator reporting to a community college district chancellor, superintendent, or president, as applicable, with independent responsibility for the comprehensive operations of the community college district’s noncredit programs.(2) Provides basic needs programs, disabled students programs and services, or mental health programs with designated coordinators, directors, or deans.(c) The board of governors shall allocate base funding for designated categorical programs to a noncredit center when the noncredit center meets all of the following conditions:(1) The conditions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b).(2) The governing board of the community college district plans to continue operating the noncredit center for at least 10 years after receiving funding under this section.(3) The board of governors approves the noncredit center to receive funding pursuant to this article.(d) The categorical programs eligible for an allocation of base funding under this section shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Basic needs.(2) Disabled students programs and services.(3) Mental health services.(4) The Student Equity and Achievement Program established under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 78220) of Chapter 2 of Part 48.(5) Veteran resource centers, including those described in Section 41207.47.(e) The board of governors, in consultation with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall determine the methodology for allocating base funding pursuant to this section.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 2 and 3.___________________